Illinois, session 104th, SB2682.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 5Section 11-9.6 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/11-9.6 new)7    Sec. 11-9.6. Therapist abuse. 8    (a) In this Section:9    "Abuse", "client", and "therapist" have the meanings 10ascribed to those terms in the Therapist Abuse Prevention and 11Accountability Act.12    "Vulnerable adult" means a person who is at least 18 years 13of age and: (1) is suffering from a developmental or 14intellectual disability or related disability; (2) has 15substance use disorder; or (3) is suffering from Alzheimer's 16disease or other forms of dementia. 17    (b) A person commits therapist abuse when he or she is a 18therapist and engages in abuse of a client or former client in 19which the therapy terminated within the previous 2 years.20    (c) The consent of the client or former client shall not be 21a defense to a prosecution under this Section. A person is 22deemed incapable of consent when he or she is a client or 23former client of the therapist.  SB2682- 2 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1    (d) This Section does not apply to any therapist who is 2lawfully married to the client or former client if the 3marriage occurred before the date of the therapy.4    (e) Therapists must report any observed or suspected 5therapist abuse to the Department of Financial and 6Professional Regulation and to a local law enforcement agency.7    (f) Sentence. Therapist abuse is a Class 3 felony. If the 8victim of the offense is under 18 years of age or is a 9vulnerable adult, the penalty is a Class 2 felony. Any 10therapist convicted of violating this Section immediately 11shall forfeit his or her professional license as a therapist 12to the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation and 13that license shall be revoked. The person convicted shall be 14permanently barred from practicing therapy within this State. 15A therapist who fails to report another therapist's abuse 16known to the therapist is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 17shall be fined not to exceed $5,000. 18    Section 10. The Sexual Exploitation in Psychotherapy, 19Professional Health Services, and Professional Mental Health 20Services Act is amended by changing the title of the Act and 21Sections 0.01, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7 and by adding Sections 226.1, 6.2, 6.3, and 6.4 as follows: 23    (740 ILCS 140/Act title)24    An Act concerning therapist abuse prevention and   SB2682- 3 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1accountability sexual exploitation by psychotherapists, 2unlicensed health professionals, or unlicensed mental health 3professionals. 4    (740 ILCS 140/0.01)  (from Ch. 70, par. 800)5    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 6Therapist Abuse Prevention and Accountability Sexual 7Exploitation in Psychotherapy, Professional Health Services, 8and Professional Mental Health Services Act.9(Source: P.A. 90-538, eff. 12-1-97.) 10    (740 ILCS 140/1)11    Sec. 1. Definitions. In this Act:12    "Abuse" means any form of sexual contact, exploitation, or 13physical harm perpetrated by a therapist against a client 14during or within 2 years after the therapeutic relationship. 15    "Client" means any individual receiving therapeutic 16services from a therapist. 17    (a) "Emotionally dependent" means that the nature of the 18patient's or former patient's emotional condition and the 19nature of the treatment provided by the psychotherapist, 20unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed mental health 21professional are such that the psychotherapist, unlicensed 22health professional, or unlicensed mental health professional 23knows or has reason to believe that the patient or former 24patient is unable to withhold consent to sexual contact by the   SB2682- 4 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed 2mental health professional.3    "Exploitation" means using the therapist's professional 4relationship with the client or former client for personal, 5financial, or sexual gain, including a dual relationship that 6impairs the judgment of the therapist or create conflicts of 7interest. 8    (b) "Former client patient" means a person who was given 9therapy psychotherapy within 2 years 1 year prior to the abuse 10by sexual contact with the therapist psychotherapist or who 11obtained a professional consultation or diagnostic or 12therapeutic service from an unlicensed health professional or 13unlicensed mental health professional within 2 years one year 14prior to the abuse by sexual contact with the unlicensed 15health professional or unlicensed mental health professional.16    (c) "Patient" means a person who seeks or obtains 17psychotherapy or who obtains a professional consultation or 18diagnostic or therapeutic service from an unlicensed health 19professional or unlicensed mental health professional.20    (d) "Psychotherapist" means a physician, psychologist, 21nurse, chemical dependency counselor, social worker, or other 22person, whether or not licensed by the State, who performs or 23purports to perform psychotherapy.24    (e) "Psychotherapy" means the professional treatment, 25assessment, or counseling of a mental or emotional illness, 26symptom, or condition. "Psychotherapy" does not include   SB2682- 5 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1counseling of a spiritual or religious nature, social work, or 2casual advice given by a friend or family member.3    (f) "Sexual contact" means any of the following, whether 4or not occurring with the consent of a client patient or former 5client patient: 6        (1) sexual intercourse, cunnilingus, fellatio, anal 7    intercourse or any intrusion, however slight, into the 8    genital or anal openings of the client patient's or former 9    client's patient's body by any part of the therapist's or 10    psychotherapist's, unlicensed health professional's, or 11    unlicensed mental health professional's body or by any 12    object used by the therapist or psychotherapist, 13    unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed mental 14    health professional for that purpose, or any intrusion, 15    however slight, into the genital or anal openings of the 16    therapist's or psychotherapist's, unlicensed health 17    professional's, or unlicensed mental health professional's 18    body by any part of the client's patient's or former 19    client's patient's body or by any object used by the 20    client patient or former client patient for that purpose, 21    if agreed to by the therapist or psychotherapist, 22    unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed mental 23    health professional; 24        (2) kissing or intentional touching by the therapist 25    or psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or 26    unlicensed mental health professional of the client's   SB2682- 6 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1    patient's or former client's patient's genital area, 2    groin, inner thigh, buttocks, or breast or the clothing 3    covering any of these body parts; 4        (3) kissing or intentional touching by the client 5    patient or former client patient of the therapist's or 6    psychotherapist's, unlicensed health professional's, or 7    unlicensed mental health professional's genital area, 8    groin, inner thigh, buttocks, or breast or the clothing 9    covering any of these body parts if the therapist or 10    psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or 11    unlicensed mental health professional agrees to the 12    kissing or intentional touching.13    "Sexual contact" includes a request by the therapist or 14psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed 15mental health professional for conduct described in paragraphs 16(1) through (3).17    "Sexual contact" does not include conduct described in 18paragraph (1) or (2) that is a part of standard medical 19treatment of a client patient, casual social contact not 20intended to be sexual in character, or inadvertent touching.21    "Therapist" means any licensed mental health professional, 22including, but not limited to, a psychiatrist, physician, 23clinical psychologist, clinical social worker, marriage and 24family therapist, or nurse providing mental health or 25developmental disabilities services or any other person not 26prohibited by law from providing such services or from holding   SB2682- 7 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1himself or herself out as a therapist if the recipient 2reasonably believes that such person is permitted to do so. 3Therapist includes any successor of the therapist. 4    (g) "Therapeutic deception" means a representation by a 5psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed 6mental health professional that sexual contact with the 7psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed 8mental health professional is consistent with or part of the 9patient's or former patient's treatment.10    (h) "Unlicensed health professional" means a person who is 11not licensed or registered to provide health services, 12including mental health services, by the Department of 13Financial and Professional Regulation or a board of 14registration duly authorized to grant licenses or registration 15to persons engaged in the practice of providing health 16services or whose license or registration to provide health 17services has been returned or revoked by the Department or 18that board.19    (i) "Unlicensed mental health professional" means a person 20who is not licensed or registered to provide mental health 21services by the Department of Professional Regulation or a 22board of registration duly authorized to grant licenses or 23registration to persons engaged in the practice of providing 24mental health services or whose license or registration to 25provide mental health services has been returned or revoked by 26the Department or that board.  SB2682- 8 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1(Source: P.A. 90-538, eff. 12-1-97.) 2    (740 ILCS 140/2)  (from Ch. 70, par. 802)3    Sec. 2. Cause of action for abuse; duty to report abuse 4sexual exploitation. 5    (a) A cause of action against a therapist or 6psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed 7mental health professional for abuse sexual exploitation 8exists for a client patient or former client patient for 9injury caused by abuse by sexual contact with the therapist or 10psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional , or 11unlicensed mental health professional, if the abuse sexual 12contact occurred: 13        (1) during the period the client patient was receiving 14    therapy psychotherapy from the therapist psychotherapist, 15    or health services from the unlicensed health 16    professional, or mental health services from the 17    unlicensed mental health professional; or 18        (2) within 2 years after the period the client patient 19    received therapy psychotherapy from the therapist 20    psychotherapist, or health services from the unlicensed 21    health professional, or mental health services from the 22    unlicensed mental health professional if (i) the former 23    patient was emotionally dependent on the psychotherapist, 24    unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed mental 25    health professional or (ii) the sexual contact occurred by   SB2682- 9 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1    means of therapeutic deception.2    (a-1) The consent of the client or former client is not a 3defense to a cause of action under this Section. A person is 4deemed incapable of consent when he or she is a person who is 5in a therapeutic relationship or has been in a therapeutic 6relationship within the previous 2 years with the therapist.7    (a-2) A therapist must report any observed or suspected 8therapist abuse as described in subsection (a) to the 9Department of Financial and Professional Regulation and to a 10local law enforcement agency. Failure to report the abuse is 11subject to the criminal penalties provided in Section 11-9.6 12of the Criminal Code of 2012 and disciplinary action by the 13Department of Financial and Professional Regulation. 14    (b) The client patient or former client patient may 15recover damages from a therapist or psychotherapist, 16unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed mental health 17professional who is found liable for abuse sexual 18exploitation. It is not a defense to the action that the abuse 19of sexual contact with a client or former client patient 20occurred outside a therapy or treatment session or that it 21occurred off the premises regularly used by the therapist or 22psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed 23mental health professional for therapy or treatment sessions.24    (c) Whenever the Attorney General has probable cause to 25believe (i) that a therapist or psychotherapist, unlicensed 26health professional, or unlicensed mental health professional   SB2682- 10 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1is having or has abused had sexual contact with one or more 2patients or clients or former patients or former clients while 3the therapist or psychotherapist, unlicensed health 4professional, or unlicensed mental health professional was 5licensed or unlicensed and (ii) that the therapist or 6psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed 7mental health professional poses a threat to the health, 8safety, or welfare of members of the public who are or may be 9patients or clients of the therapist or psychotherapist, 10unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed mental health 11professional, the Attorney General may bring an action in the 12name of the State against the therapist or psychotherapist, 13unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed mental health 14professional to restrain by temporary restraining order or 15preliminary or permanent injunction the therapist or 16psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed 17mental health professional from providing, offering to 18provide, or representing himself or herself as being able to 19provide therapy or psychotherapy, health services, or mental 20health services.21    At least 5 days prior to the commencement of any action 22brought under this Section, except when a temporary 23restraining order is sought, the Attorney General shall notify 24the therapist or psychotherapist, unlicensed health 25professional, or unlicensed mental health professional of the 26Attorney General's intended action and shall give the   SB2682- 11 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1therapist or psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, 2or unlicensed mental health professional an opportunity to 3confer with the Attorney General or his or her representative 4in person or by counsel or other representative as to the 5proposed action.6    The notice shall be given by first-class mail, postage 7prepaid, to the therapist's or psychotherapist's, unlicensed 8health professional's, or unlicensed mental health 9professional's usual place of business or, if that person has 10no usual place of business, to that person's last known 11address.12    (d) The action may be brought either in the circuit court 13of the county in which the conduct complained of occurred or in 14the circuit court of the county in which the therapist or 15psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed 16mental health professional resides or has his or her principal 17place of business.18    The court may issue temporary restraining orders or 19preliminary or permanent injunctions and make other orders or 20judgments it deems appropriate.21    (e) No injunction shall be issued under this Section 22unless the court finds that the defendant has had an 23opportunity for an evidentiary hearing as to all contested 24material issues of fact. Issues decided in a prior evidentiary 25hearing in a court or in an administrative proceeding may be 26applied to a proceeding under this Section in compliance with   SB2682- 12 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1the Code of Civil Procedure.2    If the court issues an injunction against a therapist or 3psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed 4mental health professional under this Section, the court shall 5retain jurisdiction of the matter and the cause shall be 6continued. Any therapist or psychotherapist, unlicensed health 7professional, or unlicensed mental health professional who is 8ordered to refrain from certain conduct or activities in an 9action brought under this Section may petition the court for a 10modification or termination of the injunction upon 10 days 11notice to the Attorney General.12    (f) Any State's Attorney or other law enforcement office 13receiving notice of any alleged violation of this Section or 14violation of an injunction or order issued in an action 15brought under this Section shall immediately forward written 16notice of the alleged violation together with any information 17that the State's Attorney or other law enforcement office may 18have to the office of the Attorney General.19    (g) In an action brought under this Section, whenever the 20court issues a temporary restraining order or a preliminary or 21permanent injunction ordering a defendant to refrain from 22certain conduct or activities, the order shall contain the 23following statement:24VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE.25    The clerk shall transmit 2 certified copies of each such 26order issued under this Section to each appropriate law   SB2682- 13 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1enforcement agency having jurisdiction over locations where 2the defendant is alleged to have committed the act giving rise 3to the action, and the law enforcement agency shall serve one 4copy of the order on the defendant. Unless otherwise ordered 5by the court, service shall be by delivering a copy in hand to 6the defendant.7    After any such order has been served on the defendant, any 8violation of the order by the defendant is a Class 4 felony 9punishable by a fine of not more than $25,000.10    Law enforcement agencies shall establish procedures 11adequate to ensure that all officers responsible for the 12enforcement of an order entered under this Section are 13informed of the existence and terms of the order. Whenever any 14law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that a 15defendant has violated the provisions of this Section, the 16officer has the authority to arrest the defendant.17    Whenever the court vacates a temporary restraining order 18or a preliminary or permanent injunction issued under this 19Section, the clerk shall promptly notify in writing each 20appropriate law enforcement agency that has been notified of 21the issuance of the order and shall direct each such agency to 22destroy all records of the vacated order. The law enforcement 23agency shall comply with that directive.24    (h) Nothing contained in this Section shall prohibit the 25Attorney General in his or her discretion from bringing an 26action for civil contempt against the defendant rather than   SB2682- 14 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1bringing criminal charges for an alleged violation of an order 2issued under this Section as provided in subsection (g). If 3the court finds that a therapist or psychotherapist, 4unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed mental health 5professional is in civil contempt by reason of an alleged 6violation of an injunction or the order entered under this 7Section, the court shall assess a civil penalty of not more 8than $10,000 for each such violation found.9(Source: P.A. 90-538, eff. 12-1-97.) 10    (740 ILCS 140/3)  (from Ch. 70, par. 803)11    Sec. 3. Liability of employer. An employer of a therapist 12or psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or 13unlicensed mental health professional may be liable under 14Section 2 if the employer fails or refuses to take reasonable 15action when the employer knows or has reason to know that the 16therapist or psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, 17or unlicensed mental health professional engaged in sexual 18contact with has abused the plaintiff or any other client 19patient or former client patient of the therapist or 20psychotherapist, unlicensed health professional, or unlicensed 21mental health professional.22(Source: P.A. 90-538, eff. 12-1-97.) 23    (740 ILCS 140/4)  (from Ch. 70, par. 804)24    Sec. 4. Scope of discovery; waiver of confidentiality. (a)   SB2682- 15 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1In an action for abuse sexual exploitation, evidence of the 2plaintiff's sexual history is not subject to discovery except 3when the plaintiff claims damage to sexual functioning; or4    (1) the defendant requests a hearing prior to conducting 5discovery and makes an offer of proof of the relevancy of the 6history; and7    (2) the court finds that the history is relevant and that 8the probative value of the history outweighs its prejudicial 9effect.10    (b) The court shall allow the discovery only of specific 11information or examples of the plaintiff's conduct that are 12determined by the court to be relevant. The court's order 13shall detail the information or conduct that is subject to 14discovery.15    (c) A victim of abuse may waive confidentiality of 16therapist sessions for the purpose of filing a complaint under 17this Act. A person who files a complaint under this Act or 18seeks to pursue a cause of action under this Act shall not be 19retaliated against for filing such complaint or seeking a 20cause of action under this Act. 21(Source: P.A. 85-1254.) 22    (740 ILCS 140/5)  (from Ch. 70, par. 805)23    Sec. 5. Admission of evidence. (a) In an action for abuse 24sexual exploitation, evidence of the plaintiff's sexual 25history is not admissible except when:  SB2682- 16 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1    (1) the defendant requests a hearing prior to trial and 2makes an offer of proof of the relevancy of the history; and3    (2) the court finds that the history is relevant and that 4the probative value of the history outweighs its prejudicial 5effect.6    (b) The court shall allow the admission only of specific 7information or examples of the plaintiff's conduct that are 8determined by the court to be relevant. The court's order 9shall detail the information or conduct that is admissible and 10no other such evidence may be introduced.11    (c) Violation of the terms of the order may be grounds for 12a new trial.13(Source: P.A. 85-1254.) 14    (740 ILCS 140/6)  (from Ch. 70, par. 806)15    Sec. 6. Limitation period. An action for abuse sexual 16exploitation shall be commenced within 5 2 years after the 17discovery of the abuse or, if the victim of the abuse was a 18minor at the time of the discovery of the abuse, within 2 years 19after the minor attains 18 years of age, whichever is later 20cause of action arises.21(Source: P.A. 85-1254.) 22    (740 ILCS 140/6.1 new)23    Sec. 6.1. Ethics training. All licensed therapists must 24complete annual training on professional ethics and abuse   SB2682- 17 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1prevention as provided by the Department of Financial and 2Professional Regulation. 3    (740 ILCS 140/6.2 new)4    Sec. 6.2. Suspension and revocation of therapist license; 5limited practice. The Department of Financial and Professional 6Regulation may temporarily suspend the license of a therapist 7if credible allegations of abuse are made against the 8therapist pending an investigation of the alleged abuse. The 9Department of Financial and Professional Regulation may 10require a therapist under investigation for abuse to practice 11therapy under the supervision of another licensed therapist of 12his or her license classification during all client 13interactions. 14    (740 ILCS 140/6.3 new)15    Sec. 6.3. Public awareness campaign. The Department of 16Human Services shall conduct public awareness campaigns about 17client rights under this Act and how to report therapist 18abuse. 19    (740 ILCS 140/6.4 new)20    Sec. 6.4. Counseling and legal assistance. The Department 21of Human Services shall provide counseling to victims of 22therapist abuse. The Attorney General shall provide legal 23assistance to victims of therapist abuse.   SB2682- 18 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1    (740 ILCS 140/7)  (from Ch. 70, par. 807)2    Sec. 7. Application. This Act applies only to causes of 3action arising on or after its effective date and applies to 4all licensed therapists practicing in this State. This Act, 5except Sections 6.1 and 6.2, apply to unlicensed health 6professionals subject to this Act.7(Source: P.A. 85-1254.)  SB2682- 19 -LRB104 14380 RLC 27516 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    720 ILCS 5/11-9.6 new4    740 ILCS 140/Act title5    740 ILCS 140/0.01from Ch. 70, par. 8006    740 ILCS 140/1from Ch. 70, par. 8017    740 ILCS 140/2from Ch. 70, par. 8028    740 ILCS 140/3from Ch. 70, par. 8039    740 ILCS 140/4from Ch. 70, par. 80410    740 ILCS 140/5from Ch. 70, par. 80511    740 ILCS 140/6from Ch. 70, par. 80612    740 ILCS 140/6.1 new13    740 ILCS 140/6.2 new14    740 ILCS 140/6.3 new15    740 ILCS 140/6.4 new16    740 ILCS 140/7from Ch. 70, par. 807